Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,154
Nail technology school; transfer of students.

Nail technology students or nail technology student instructors may transfer from one nail technology school to another school at any time.

The school to which the student is transferring shall be entitled to receive from the student's previous school, upon request, any and all records pertaining to the student after all financial obligations of the student to the previous school are met.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 74;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,225;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 416;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 56.